Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-402
Easement; authority of executor, administrator, guardian, trustee, or conservator to execute; petition; notice; hearing; order.

(1) Before entering into any such contracts for such easements, an application shall be duly filed in the county court of the county in which the estate, guardianship, or conservatorship proceedings are pending, or trust is being administered, or in the county court of the county where the real estate is located, duly sworn and signed by the executor, administrator, trustee, conservator, or guardian, as the case may be. The application shall set forth in detail the nature and character of the contract and conveyance of the easement upon and across the lands of the estates, the purposes for which the same are to be used and maintained, the terms and conditions thereof, the consideration therefor, and the reasons why the same is for the best interests of the estate. The court or any judge thereof in chambers shall set the application for hearing and direct to what persons and in what manner notice of such hearing shall be given.

(2) At the time and place set for the hearing, as is provided for by subsection (1) of this section, the court shall conduct a hearing upon the application and if, after due consideration thereof, the court finds that the granting of the easement for the erection and maintaining of the pipeline upon or across the land, will not result in a material injury to the property of the deceased person, beneficiary of the trust, minor, incompetent, or person unfit by reason of infirmities of age or physical disability, and further finds that the consideration therefor is adequate and proper, the court may approve the application and authorize and direct the executor, administrator, trustee, conservator, or guardian to enter into such contract and to execute such grants or conveyances to carry the same into effect, and authorize and direct the executor, administrator, trustee, conservator, or guardian to deliver the same to the persons, individuals, firms, or corporations with whom the same were authorized to be made.

Laws 1951, c. 186, § 2, p. 692;

Laws 1955, c. 218, § 1, p. 609;

Laws 1967, c. 350, § 5, p. 930;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 265.